Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3199.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-17.5-21 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-17.5 entitled "Rights
of Nursing Home Patients" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-17.5-21. Penalties. Penalties -- Civil violation.
(a) Any nursing home which refuses or neglects to post provisions or which violates the
requirements of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for each violation punishable by a
fine of up to five hundred dollars ($500) and/or six (6) months in jail.
(b) Any person, including any estate, shall have a cause of action, independent and in
addition to any other legal remedy available, against any nursing home in violation of this chapter.
This cause of action to recover actual and punitive damages shall be brought in a court of competent
jurisdiction, and any plaintiff who prevails in such action shall be entitled to recover reasonable
attorneys' fees and costs of any action.
(c) The department of health may maintain an action in the name of the state to enforce the
provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005214
========